test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: waaboozenhimiwaaiban
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: waaboozenhiminiiban
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozensiminaanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozensiminaanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozensiminaaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: waaboozensimiwaaan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: waaboozensimiwaaag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: waaboozensimiwaaing
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: waaboozensiminian
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: waaboozensiminiag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: waaboozensiminiing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozenhiminaanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozenhiminaanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozenhiminaaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: waaboozenhimiwaaan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: waaboozenhimiwaaag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: waaboozenhimiwaaing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: waaboozenhiminian
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: waaboozenhiminiag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: waaboozenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: waaboozensimibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: waaboozensimibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: waaboozensimibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensim***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensim***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensim***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhimibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhimibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhimibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhim***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhim***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozensishinaaniban
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozensishinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waaboozensishiwaaiban
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waaboozensishiniiban
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozensishini***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozenhishinaaniban
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waaboozenhishiwaaiban
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waaboozenhishiniiban
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozensishinaanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozensishinaanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozensishinaaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waaboozensishiwaaan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waaboozensishiwaaag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waaboozensishiwaaing
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waaboozensishinian
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waaboozensishiniag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waaboozensishiniing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozenhishinaanan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozenhishinaanag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozenhishinaaning
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waaboozenhishiwaaan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waaboozenhishiwaaag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waaboozenhishiwaaing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waaboozenhishinian
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waaboozenhishiniag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waaboozenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: waaboozensishibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: waaboozensishibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: waaboozensishibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensish***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensish***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensish***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhishibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhishibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhishibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhish***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhish***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensinaanibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensinaanibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensinaanibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozensiniibanan
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozensiniibanag
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozensiniibaning
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensini***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhinaanibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhinaanibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhinaanibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhiniibanan
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhiniibanag
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhiniibaning
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozimishinaaniban
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozimishinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waaboozimishiwaaiban
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waaboozimishiniiban
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozimishinaanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozimishinaanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozimishinaaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waaboozimishiwaaan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waaboozimishiwaaag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waaboozimishiwaaing
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waaboozimishinian
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waaboozimishiniag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waaboozimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: waaboozimishibanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: waaboozimishibanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: waaboozimishibaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimish***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimish***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waabooziminaanibanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waabooziminaanibanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waabooziminaanibaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waabooziminaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waabooziminaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waabooziminaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozimiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozimiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozimiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waabooziminiibanan
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waabooziminiibanag
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waabooziminiibaning
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozishinaanibanan
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozishinaanibanag
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozishinaanibaning
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozishiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozishiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozishiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozishiniibanan
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozishiniibanag
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozishiniibaning
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozishini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozishini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozensimishinaan
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niwaaboozensimishiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niwaaboozensimishini
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niwaaboozenhimishinaan
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niwaaboozenhimishiwaa
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niwaaboozenhimishini
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozensimishinaan
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giwaaboozensimishiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giwaaboozensimishini
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giwaaboozenhimishinaan
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giwaaboozenhimishiwaa
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giwaaboozenhimishini
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: owaaboozensimishinaan
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: owaaboozensimishiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: owaaboozensimishini
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: owaaboozenhimishinaan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: owaaboozenhimishiwaa
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: owaaboozenhimishini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iwaaboozensimishinaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iwaaboozensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iwaaboozensimishini
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iwaaboozenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iwaaboozenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iwaaboozenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: niwaaboozensimishiban
